Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 6. Political Rights.

Cross references. —

For prohibitions related to political activity, see AS

39.25.160

.

Sec. 39.25.178.
Employee political rights.

A state employee may

be a member of a national, state, or local political party;

take part in a political campaign;

express political opinions; however, while engaged on official business, a state employee may not display or distribute partisan political material;

register party preference;

serve as a voting or nonvoting delegate to a party convention;

be appointed, nominated, or elected to nonpartisan public office in a local government unit; and

make contributions to a political party or a candidate for public office.

History.

(§ 19 ch 112 SLA 1982)

Sec. 39.25.180.
Status of present employees. [Repealed, § 78 ch 59 SLA 1982; § 20 ch 112 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 39.25.181.
[Renumbered as AS 39.25.990.]

Sec. 39.25.190.
[Renumbered as AS 39.25.910.]